Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-103.51
Primary source of supply in the United States, defined.

(1) Primary source of supply in the United States means:

(a) The manufacturer, producer, or owner of any alcoholic liquor at the time it becomes a marketable product in the United States;

(b) The bottler of any alcoholic liquor in the United States;

(c) The exclusive agent within the United States or any of the states of any manufacturer, producer, owner, or bottler of any alcoholic liquor outside the United States; or

(d) A licensed Nebraska craft brewery, farm winery, microdistillery, or manufacturer.

(2) To be the primary source of supply in the United States, the licensee causing such alcoholic liquor to be imported into Nebraska must be the first source, such as the manufacturer or the source closest to the manufacturer, in the channel of commerce from which the product can be secured by Nebraska licensed wholesalers.

Laws 2023, LB376, § 4.